Vermont, session 2025-2026, H415.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. APPROPRIATION; FRANKLIN COUNTY FIELD DAYS; LAND
PURCHASE; RELOCATION COSTS
The following sums are appropriated from the General Fund to the Agency
of Agriculture, Food and Markets in fiscal year 2026 for grants to the Franklin
County Field Days agricultural fair association of:
VT LEG #381037 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.415
2025 Page 2 of 2
(1) $350,000.00 for the purchase of land for the fair; and
(2) $350,000.00 for the relocation of existing fair structures from the
Franklin County State Airport.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381037 v.1